Idaho, session 2026, H0875.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 35, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3512B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3512B. CALCULATED REDUCTION FROM THE GOVERNOR'S BUDGET DOCU-
MENT. The legislative services office shall provide the joint finance-ap-
propriations committee with a calculated reduction from the governor's bud-
get document provided for in section 67-3506, Idaho Code. The calculated re-
duction shall include each of the changes for employee benefit costs, health
insurance costs, and employee compensation for all entities that receive an
appropriation by the legislature pursuant to 67-3514, Idaho Code, and that
are authorized to have fifty (50) or more full-time equivalent positions. A
reduction shall be calculated using a five (5) year average of actual person-
nel cost expenditures divided by total personnel costs originally appropri-
ated. If the entity has been in existence for less than five (5) years, the
reduction shall be an average of all years in existence. The joint committee
may include the calculated reductions as part of each entity's appropriation
bill. The calculated reduction shall be applied to all fund types.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.